Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders

194.550.
Definitions for KRS 194.550 to KRS 194.559. [Repealed.]

194.552.
Office on Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders — Director — Report — Purposes and duties. [Repealed.]

194.555.
Alzheimer’s Disease and Related Disorders Council — Members — Duties. [Repealed.]

194.559.
Authority to promulgate administrative regulations. [Repealed.]